Utah statutes.
23-25-6.   Reciprocal recognition of suspension.

(1)  All participating states shall recognize the suspension of license privileges of a person by the participating state as though the violation resulting in the suspension:

(a)  had occurred in their state; and

(b)  could have been the basis of the suspension of license privileges in their state.

(2)  Each participating state shall communicate suspension information to other participating states in the form and with the content as contained in the compact manual.

